Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2. Control Board Generally.
§ 62.1-44.15.
(For expiration date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Powers and duties; civil penalties.

It shall be the duty of the Board and it shall have the authority:

[Repealed.]

To study and investigate all problems concerned with the quality of state waters and to make reports and recommendations.

(2a)

To study and investigate methods, procedures, devices, appliances, and technologies that could assist in water conservation or water consumption reduction.

(2b)

To coordinate its efforts toward water conservation with other persons or groups, within or without the Commonwealth.

(2c)

To make reports concerning, and formulate recommendations based upon, any such water conservation studies to ensure that present and future water needs of the citizens of the Commonwealth are met.

(3a)

To establish such standards of quality and policies for any state waters consistent with the general policy set forth in this chapter, and to modify, amend or cancel any such standards or policies established and to take all appropriate steps to prevent quality alteration contrary to the public interest or to standards or policies thus established, except that a description of provisions of any proposed standard or policy adopted by regulation which are more restrictive than applicable federal requirements, together with the reason why the more restrictive provisions are needed, shall be provided to the standing committee of each house of the General Assembly to which matters relating to the content of the standard or policy are most properly referable. The Board shall, from time to time, but at least once every three years, hold public hearings pursuant to §

2.2-4007.01

but, upon the request of an affected person or upon its own motion, hold hearings pursuant to §

2.2-4009

, for the purpose of reviewing the standards of quality, and, as appropriate, adopting, modifying, or canceling such standards. Whenever the Board considers the adoption, modification, amendment or cancellation of any standard, it shall give due consideration to, among other factors, the economic and social costs and benefits which can reasonably be expected to obtain as a consequence of the standards as adopted, modified, amended or cancelled. The Board shall also give due consideration to the public health standards issued by the Virginia Department of Health with respect to issues of public health policy and protection. If the Board does not follow the public health standards of the Virginia Department of Health, the Board’s reason for any deviation shall be made in writing and published for any and all concerned parties.

(3b)

Except as provided in subdivision (3a), such standards and policies are to be adopted or modified, amended or cancelled in the manner provided by the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

(5a)

All certificates issued by the Board under this chapter shall have fixed terms. The term of a Virginia Pollution Discharge Elimination System permit shall not exceed five years. The term of a Virginia Water Protection Permit shall be based upon the projected duration of the project, the length of any required monitoring, or other project operations or permit conditions; however, the term shall not exceed 15 years. The term of a Virginia Pollution Abatement permit shall not exceed 10 years, except that the term of a Virginia Pollution Abatement permit for confined animal feeding operations shall be 10 years. The Department of Environmental Quality shall inspect all facilities for which a Virginia Pollution Abatement permit has been issued to ensure compliance with statutory, regulatory, and permit requirements. Department personnel performing inspections of confined animal feeding operations shall be certified under the voluntary nutrient management training and certification program established in § 10.1-104.2. The term of a certificate issued by the Board shall not be extended by modification beyond the maximum duration and the certificate shall expire at the end of the term unless an application for a new permit has been timely filed as required by the regulations of the Board and the Board is unable, through no fault of the permittee, to issue a new permit before the expiration date of the previous permit.

(5b)

Any certificate issued by the Board under this chapter may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, be amended or revoked on any of the following grounds or for good cause as may be provided by the regulations of the Board:

The owner has violated any regulation or order of the Board, any condition of a certificate, any provision of this chapter, or any order of a court, where such violation results in a release of harmful substances into the environment or poses a substantial threat of release of harmful substances into the environment or presents a hazard to human health or the violation is representative of a pattern of serious or repeated violations which, in the opinion of the Board, demonstrates the owner’s disregard for or inability to comply with applicable laws, regulations, or requirements;

The owner has failed to disclose fully all relevant material facts or has misrepresented a material fact in applying for a certificate, or in any other report or document required under this law or under the regulations of the Board;

The activity for which the certificate was issued endangers human health or the environment and can be regulated to acceptable levels by amendment or revocation of the certificate; or

There exists a material change in the basis on which the permit was issued that requires either a temporary or a permanent reduction or elimination of any discharge controlled by the certificate necessary to protect human health or the environment.

Whenever the Board shall determine that any owner, whether or not he shall have been issued a certificate for discharge of waste, has discharged sewage, industrial waste, or other waste into state waters in such quantity, concentration or manner that fish are killed as a result thereof, it may effect such settlement with the owner as will cover the costs incurred by the Board and by the Department of Wildlife Resources in investigating such killing of fish, plus the replacement value of the fish destroyed, or as it deems proper, and if no such settlement is reached within a reasonable time, the Board shall authorize its executive secretary to bring a civil action in the name of the Board to recover from the owner such costs and value, plus any court or other legal costs incurred in connection with such action.

If the owner is a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, the action may be brought in any circuit court within the territory embraced by such political subdivision. If the owner is an establishment, as defined in this chapter, the action shall be brought in the circuit court of the city or the circuit court of the county in which such establishment is located. If the owner is an individual or group of individuals, the action shall be brought in the circuit court of the city or circuit court of the county in which such person or any of them reside.

For the purposes of this subdivision 11, the State Water Control Board shall be deemed the owner of the fish killed and the proceedings shall be as though the State Water Control Board were the owner of the fish. The fact that the owner has or held a certificate issued under this chapter shall not be raised as a defense in bar to any such action.

The proceeds of any recovery had under this subdivision 11 shall, when received by the Board, be applied, first, to reimburse the Board for any expenses incurred in investigating such killing of fish. The balance shall be paid to the Board of Wildlife Resources to be used for the fisheries’ management practices as in its judgment will best restore or replace the fisheries’ values lost as a result of such discharge of waste, including, where appropriate, replacement of the fish killed with game fish or other appropriate species. Any such funds received are hereby appropriated for that purpose.

Nothing in this subdivision 11 shall be construed in any way to limit or prevent any other action which is now authorized by law by the Board against any owner.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the provisions of this subdivision 11 shall not apply to any owner who adds or applies any chemicals or other substances that are recommended or approved by the State Department of Health to state waters in the course of processing or treating such waters for public water supply purposes, except where negligence is shown.

(5c)

Any certificate issued by the Board under this chapter relating to dredging projects governed under Chapter 12 (§

28.2-1200

et seq.) or Chapter 13 (§

28.2-1300

et seq.) of Title 28.2 may be conditioned upon a demonstration of financial responsibility for the completion of compensatory mitigation requirements. Financial responsibility may be demonstrated by a letter of credit, a certificate of deposit or a performance bond executed in a form approved by the Board. If the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers requires demonstration of financial responsibility for the completion of compensatory mitigation required for a particular project, then the mechanism and amount approved by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers shall be used to meet this requirement.

(8a)

Except as otherwise provided in Articles 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) and 2.5 (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.), to issue special orders to owners who (i) are permitting or causing the pollution, as defined by §

62.1-44.3

, of state waters to cease and desist from such pollution, (ii) have failed to construct facilities in accordance with final approved plans and specifications to construct such facilities in accordance with final approved plans and specifications, (iii) have violated the terms and provisions of a certificate issued by the Board to comply with such terms and provisions, (iv) have failed to comply with a directive from the Board to comply with such directive, (v) have contravened duly adopted and promulgated water quality standards and policies to cease and desist from such contravention and to comply with such water quality standards and policies, (vi) have violated the terms and provisions of a pretreatment permit issued by the Board or by the owner of a publicly owned treatment works to comply with such terms and provisions or (vii) have contravened any applicable pretreatment standard or requirement to comply with such standard or requirement; and also to issue such orders to require any owner to comply with the provisions of this chapter and any decision of the Board. Except as otherwise provided by a separate article, orders issued pursuant to this subdivision may include civil penalties of up to $32,500 per violation, not to exceed $100,000 per order. The Board may assess penalties under this subdivision if (a) the person has been issued at least two written notices of alleged violation by the Department for the same or substantially related violations at the same site, (b) such violations have not been resolved by demonstration that there was no violation, by an order issued by the Board or the Director, or by other means, (c) at least 130 days have passed since the issuance of the first notice of alleged violation, and (d) there is a finding that such violations have occurred after a hearing conducted in accordance with subdivision (8b). The actual amount of any penalty assessed shall be based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty. The Board shall provide the person with the calculation for the proposed penalty prior to any hearing conducted for the issuance of an order that assesses penalties pursuant to this subdivision. The issuance of a notice of alleged violation by the Department shall not be considered a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

. Any notice of alleged violation shall include a description of each violation, the specific provision of law violated, and information on the process for obtaining a final decision or fact finding from the Department on whether or not a violation has occurred, and nothing in this section shall preclude an owner from seeking such a determination. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund (§ 10.1-2500 et seq.), except that civil penalties assessed for violations of Article 9 (§

62.1-44.3

4:8 et seq.) or Article 11 (§

62.1-44.34:14

et seq.) shall be paid into the Virginia Petroleum Storage Tank Fund in accordance with §

62.1-44.34:11

, and except that civil penalties assessed for violations of Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of §

62.1-44.15:48

.

(8b)

Such special orders are to be issued only after a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Court in accordance with §

2.2-4020

or, if requested by the person, before a quorum of the Board with at least 30 days’ notice to the affected owners, of the time, place and purpose thereof, and they shall become effective not less than 15 days after service as provided in §

62.1-44.12

; provided that if the Board finds that any such owner is grossly affecting or presents an imminent and substantial danger to (i) the public health, safety or welfare, or the health of animals, fish or aquatic life; (ii) a public water supply; or (iii) recreational, commercial, industrial, agricultural or other reasonable uses, it may issue, without advance notice or hearing, an emergency special order directing the owner to cease such pollution or discharge immediately, and shall provide an opportunity for a hearing, after reasonable notice as to the time and place thereof to the owner, to affirm, modify, amend or cancel such emergency special order. If an owner who has been issued such a special order or an emergency special order is not complying with the terms thereof, the Board may proceed in accordance with §

62.1-44.23

, and where the order is based on a finding of an imminent and substantial danger, the court shall issue an injunction compelling compliance with the emergency special order pending a hearing by the Board. If an emergency special order requires cessation of a discharge, the Board shall provide an opportunity for a hearing within 48 hours of the issuance of the injunction.

(8c)

The provisions of this section notwithstanding, the Board may proceed directly under §

62.1-44.32

for any past violation or violations of any provision of this chapter or any regulation duly promulgated hereunder.

(8d)

With the consent of any owner who has violated or failed, neglected or refused to obey any regulation or order of the Board, any condition of a permit or any provision of this chapter, the Board may provide, in an order issued by the Board against such person, for the payment of civil charges for past violations in specific sums not to exceed the limit specified in §

62.1-44.32

(a). Such civil charges shall be instead of any appropriate civil penalty which could be imposed under §

62.1-44.32 (a)

and shall not be subject to the provisions of §

2.2-514

. Such civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund (§ 10.1-2500 et seq.), excluding civil charges assessed for violations of Article 9 (§

62.1-44.34:8

et seq.) or 10 (§

62.1-44.34:10

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1, or a regulation, administrative or judicial order, or term or condition of approval relating to or issued under those articles, or civil charges assessed for violations of Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.), or a regulation, administrative or judicial order, or term or condition of approval relating to or issued under that article.The amendments to this section adopted by the 1976 Session of the General Assembly shall not be construed as limiting or expanding any cause of action or any other remedy possessed by the Board prior to the effective date of said amendments.

(8e)

The Board shall develop and provide an opportunity for public comment on guidelines and procedures that contain specific criteria for calculating the appropriate penalty for each violation based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty.

(8f)

Before issuing a special order under subdivision (8a) or by consent under (8d), with or without an assessment of a civil penalty, to an owner of a sewerage system requiring corrective action to prevent or minimize overflows of sewage from such system, the Board shall provide public notice of and reasonable opportunity to comment on the proposed order. Any such order under subdivision (8d) may impose civil penalties in amounts up to the maximum amount authorized in § 309(g) of the Clean Water Act. Any person who comments on the proposed order shall be given notice of any hearing to be held on the terms of the order. In any hearing held, such person shall have a reasonable opportunity to be heard and to present evidence. If no hearing is held before issuance of an order under subdivision (8d), any person who commented on the proposed order may file a petition, within 30 days after the issuance of such order, requesting the Board to set aside such order and provide a formal hearing thereon. If the evidence presented by the petitioner in support of the petition is material and was not considered in the issuance of the order, the Board shall immediately set aside the order, provide a formal hearing, and make such petitioner a party. If the Board denies the petition, the Board shall provide notice to the petitioner and make available to the public the reasons for such denial, and the petitioner shall have the right to judicial review of such decision under §

62.1-44.29

if he meets the requirements thereof.

(8g)

To issue special orders for violations of this chapter to persons constructing or operating any natural gas transmission pipeline greater than 36 inches inside diameter. An order issued pursuant to this subdivision may include a civil penalty of up to $50,000 per violation, not to exceed $500,000 per order. The Board may assess a penalty under this subdivision if (i) the person has been issued at least two written notices of alleged violation by the Department for violations involving the same pipeline; (ii) such violations have not been resolved by a demonstration that there was no violation, by an order issued by the Board or the Director, including an order pursuant to subdivision (8d), or by other means; and (iii) there is a finding that such violation occurred after a hearing was conducted (a) before a hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Court, (b) in accordance with §

2.2-4020

, and (c) with at least 30 days’ notice to such person of the time, place, and purpose thereof. Such order shall become effective not less than 15 days after service as provided in §

62.1-44.12

. The actual amount of any penalty assessed shall be based upon the severity of the violation, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty. The Board shall provide the person with the calculation for the proposed penalty prior to any hearing conducted for the issuance of an order that assesses penalties pursuant to this subdivision. The issuance of a notice of alleged violation by the Department shall not be a case decision as defined in §

2.2-4001

. Any notice of alleged violation shall include a description of each violation, the specific provision of law violated, and information on the process for obtaining a final decision or fact-finding from the Department on whether or not a violation has occurred, and nothing in this subdivision shall preclude a person from seeking such a determination. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund (§ 10.1-2500 et seq.), except that civil penalties assessed for violations of Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) or 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund (§

62.1-44.15:29

).

(4)

To conduct or have conducted scientific experiments, investigations, studies, and research to discover methods for maintaining water quality consistent with the purposes of this chapter. To this end the Board may cooperate with any public or private agency in the conduct of such experiments, investigations and research and may receive in behalf of the Commonwealth any moneys that any such agency may contribute as its share of the cost under any such cooperative agreement. Such moneys shall be used only for the purposes for which they are contributed and any balance remaining after the conclusion of the experiments, investigations, studies, and research, shall be returned to the contributors.

(5)

To issue, revoke or amend certificates under prescribed conditions for: (a) the discharge of sewage, industrial wastes and other wastes into or adjacent to state waters; (b) the alteration otherwise of the physical, chemical or biological properties of state waters; (c) excavation in a wetland; or (d) on and after October 1, 2001, the conduct of the following activities in a wetland: (i) new activities to cause draining that significantly alters or degrades existing wetland acreage or functions, (ii) filling or dumping, (iii) permanent flooding or impounding, or (iv) new activities that cause significant alteration or degradation of existing wetland acreage or functions. However, to the extent allowed by federal law, any person holding a certificate issued by the Board that is intending to upgrade the permitted facility by installing technology, control equipment, or other apparatus that the permittee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Director will result in improved energy efficiency, reduction in the amount of nutrients discharged, and improved water quality shall not be required to obtain a new, modified, or amended permit. The permit holder shall provide the demonstration anticipated by this subdivision to the Department no later than 30 days prior to commencing construction.

(6)

To make investigations and inspections, to ensure compliance with any certificates, standards, policies, rules, regulations, rulings and special orders which it may adopt, issue or establish and to furnish advice, recommendations, or instructions for the purpose of obtaining such compliance. In recognition of §§

32.1-164

and

62.1-44.18

, the Board and the State Department of Health shall enter into a memorandum of understanding establishing a common format to consolidate and simplify inspections of sewage treatment plants and coordinate the scheduling of the inspections. The new format shall ensure that all sewage treatment plants are inspected at appropriate intervals in order to protect water quality and public health and at the same time avoid any unnecessary administrative burden on those being inspected.

(7)

To adopt rules governing the procedure of the Board with respect to: (a) hearings; (b) the filing of reports; (c) the issuance of certificates and special orders; and (d) all other matters relating to procedure; and to amend or cancel any rule adopted. Public notice of every rule adopted under this section shall be by such means as the Board may prescribe.

(9)

To make such rulings under §§

62.1-44.16

,

62.1-44.17

, and

62.1-44.19

as may be required upon requests or applications to the Board, the owner or owners affected to be notified by certified mail as soon as practicable after the Board makes them and such rulings to become effective upon such notification.

(10)

To adopt such regulations as it deems necessary to enforce the general water quality management program of the Board in all or part of the Commonwealth, except that a description of provisions of any proposed regulation which are more restrictive than applicable federal requirements, together with the reason why the more restrictive provisions are needed, shall be provided to the standing committee of each house of the General Assembly to which matters relating to the content of the regulation are most properly referable.

(11)

To investigate any large-scale killing of fish.

(12)

To administer programs of financial assistance for planning, construction, operation, and maintenance of water quality control facilities for political subdivisions in the Commonwealth.

(13)

To establish policies and programs for effective area-wide or basin-wide water quality control and management. The Board may develop comprehensive pollution abatement and water quality control plans on an area-wide or basin-wide basis. In conjunction with this, the Board, when considering proposals for waste treatment facilities, is to consider the feasibility of combined or joint treatment facilities and is to ensure that the approval of waste treatment facilities is in accordance with the water quality management and pollution control plan in the watershed or basin as a whole. In making such determinations, the Board is to seek the advice of local, regional, or state planning authorities.

(14)

To establish requirements for the treatment of sewage, industrial wastes and other wastes that are consistent with the purposes of this chapter; however, no treatment shall be less than secondary or its equivalent, unless the owner can demonstrate that a lesser degree of treatment is consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(15)

To promote and establish requirements for the reclamation and reuse of wastewater that are protective of state waters and public health as an alternative to directly discharging pollutants into waters of the state. The requirements shall address various potential categories of reuse and may include general permits and provide for greater flexibility and less stringent requirements commensurate with the quality of the reclaimed water and its intended use. The requirements shall be developed in consultation with the Department of Health and other appropriate state agencies. This authority shall not be construed as conferring upon the Board any power or duty duplicative of those of the State Board of Health.

(16)

To establish and implement policies and programs to protect and enhance the Commonwealth’s wetland resources. Regulatory programs shall be designed to achieve no net loss of existing wetland acreage and functions. Voluntary and incentive-based programs shall be developed to achieve a net resource gain in acreage and functions of wetlands. The Board shall seek and obtain advice and guidance from the Virginia Institute of Marine Science in implementing these policies and programs.

(17)

To establish additional procedures for obtaining a Virginia Water Protection Permit pursuant to §§

62.1-44.15:20

and

62.1-44.15:22

for a proposed water withdrawal involving the transfer of water resources between major river basins within the Commonwealth that may impact water basins in another state. Such additional procedures shall not apply to any water withdrawal in existence as of July 1, 2012, except where the expansion of such withdrawal requires a permit under §§

62.1-44.15:20

and

62.1-44.15:22

, in which event such additional procedures may apply to the extent of the expanded withdrawal only. The applicant shall provide as part of the application (i) an analysis of alternatives to such a transfer, (ii) a comprehensive analysis of the impacts that would occur in the source and receiving basins, (iii) a description of measures to mitigate any adverse impacts that may arise, (iv) a description of how notice shall be provided to interested parties, and (v) any other requirements that the Board may adopt that are consistent with the provisions of this section and §§ 62.1-44.15:20 and

62.1-44.15:22

or regulations adopted thereunder. This subdivision shall not be construed as limiting or expanding the Board’s authority under §§ 62.1-44.15:20 and

62.1-44.15:22

to issue permits and impose conditions or limitations on the permitted activity.

(18)

To be the lead agency for the Commonwealth’s nonpoint source pollution management program, including coordination of the nonpoint source control elements of programs developed pursuant to certain state and federal laws, including § 319 of the federal Clean Water Act and § 6217 of the federal Coastal Zone Management Act. Further responsibilities include the adoption of regulations necessary to implement a nonpoint source pollution management program in the Commonwealth, the distribution of assigned funds, the identification and establishment of priorities to address nonpoint source related water quality problems, the administration of the Statewide Nonpoint Source Advisory Committee, and the development of a program for the prevention and control of soil erosion, sediment deposition, and nonagricultural runoff to conserve Virginia’s natural resources.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-27; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1972, c. 741; 1975, c. 335; 1976, c. 621; 1977, c. 32; 1978, c. 827; 1984, c. 11; 1985, cc. 249, 397; 1988, cc. 167, 328; 1989, c. 389; 1990, c. 717; 1991, cc. 239, 718; 1993, c. 456; 1994, c. 698; 1998, cc. 805, 863; 2000, cc. 972, 1032, 1054; 2002, cc. 49, 396; 2004, c. 431; 2005, c. 706; 2007, cc. 144, 633, 873, 916; 2011, cc. 52, 101; 2012, cc. 574, 581; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2020, cc. 449, 958.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1989, c. 389, cl. 2 provides that the act shall not affect any pending litigation to which the State Water Control Board is a party.

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1054, cl. 4 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to restrict the State Water Control Board’s authority to issue Virginia Water Protection Permits for activities requiring certification under § 401 of the Clean Water Act.”

Acts
2002, cc. 49 and
396, cl. 2 provide: “That the State Water Control Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts
2005, c. 706, cl. 2 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop uniform procedures to govern the formal hearings conducted pursuant to this act to ensure they are conducted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, any policies adopted by the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, or the State Air Pollution Control Board and to ensure that the facility owners and operators have access to information on how such hearings will be conducted. In addition, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop and implement an early dispute resolution process to help identify and resolve disagreements regarding what is required to comply with the regulations promulgated by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board and any related guidance. The process shall be available after the issuance of a notice of alleged violation or other notice of deficiency issued by the Department. The early dispute resolution process shall be developed by September 1, 2005, and information on the process shall be provided to the public and to facilities potentially impacted by the provisions of this act.”

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 ( §

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 7 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to administer and implement the Virginia Stormwater Management Act ( § 10.1-603.1 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law ( § 10.1-560 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act ( § 10.1-2100 et seq. of the Code of Virginia) are transferred from the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to the State Water Control Board, and the State Water Control Board may amend, modify, or delete provisions in these regulations in order to implement this act. Such regulations shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the State Water Control Board.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 972 substituted “this title” for “title 62.1” near the end of subdivision (8d) and added subdivision (15).

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1032 and 1054 are identical, and rewrote subdivision (5), which formerly read: “To issue certificates for the discharge of sewage, industrial wastes and other wastes into or adjacent to or the alteration otherwise of the physical, chemical or biological properties of state waters under prescribed conditions and to revoke or amend such certificates”; added the third sentence in subdivision (5a); substituted “this title” for “title 62.1” in the last sentence of subdivision (8d); and added subdivision (15) (now subdivision 16).

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 49 and 396 are identical, and added subdivision (5c).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 431 substituted “that” for “which” in subdivisions (2a) and (4); substituted “15” for “fifteen” in subdivisions (5a) and (8b); in subdivision (5a), twice substituted “10” for “ten” and inserted the present third sentence; and in subdivision (8b), substituted “30” for “thirty” and “48” for “forty-eight.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 706 inserted the second through eight sentences in subdivision (8a), “before a hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Court in accordance with §

2.2-4020

or, if requested by the person, before a quorum of the Board” in the first sentence in subdivision (8b); in subdivision (8c), deleted “pursuant to Chapter 25” preceding “(§ 10.1-2500 et seq.)” and “of Title 10.1” preceding “excluding civil charges”; inserted subdivision (8e); and substituted “the” for “this” preceding “Commonwealth” in subdivision (12).

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 144 added subdivision (8f).

The 2007 amendment by c. 633 deleted the third sentence in subdivision (5a).

The 2007 amendments by cc. 873 and 916 are identical, and substituted “§

2.2-4007.01

” for “subsection B of §

2.2-4007

” in subdivision (3a).

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 52 and 101 are identical, and in the fifth sentence in subdivision (5a), substituted “permit has been issued to ensure compliance with statutory, regulatory, and permit requirements” for “permit has been issued at least once every five years, except that the Department shall inspect all facilities covered by the Virginia Pollution Abatement permit for confined animal feeding operations annually.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 574 added subdivision (17).

The 2012 amendment by c. 581 added the second and third sentences of subdivision (5), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and in subdivision (8a), substituted “Except as otherwise provided in Articles 2.4 (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) and 2.5 (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) issue” for “To issue” at the beginning of the first sentence, added the exception at the beginning of the second sentence, and added “and except that civil penalties assessed for violations of Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of §

62.1-44.15:48

” at the end of the eighth sentence; added “articles, or civil charges assessed for violations of Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.), or a regulation, administrative or judicial order, or term or condition of approval relating to or issued under that article” at the end of the third sentence of the first paragraph of subdivision (8e); and added subdivision (18).

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 449, in subdivision (8a), in the first sentence, substituted “to issue special orders to owners who” for “issue special orders to owners” and deleted “who” following the (i) through (vii) designators, and substituted “this subdivision” for “this subsection” wherever it occurs; added subdivision (8g); and in subdivisions (11) (c) through (f), substituted “subdivision 11” for “subsection” wherever it occurs.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, in subdivision (11) (a), substituted “by the Board and by the Department of Wildlife Resources” for “by the Board and by the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” and in subdivision (11) (d), substituted “Board of Wildlife Resources” for “Board of Game and Inland Fisheries” in the second sentence.

Cross references.

As to power of Board to promulgate rules regulating discharge of waste from boats, see §

62.1-44.33

.

As to duties of Potomac Aquifer Recharge Oversight Committee concerning imminent danger to the environment, public water supply or public health, see §§

62.1-273

and

62.1-275

.

As to alternate compliance methods for persons or facilities meeting the criteria for E3 or E4 facilities under § 10.1- 1187.3, see § 10.1-1187.6.

As to authority of localities to assess civil penalties in order to enforce standards for use and services of sanitary, combined and stormwater sewer systems, treatment works and appurtenances, see subdivision 10 of §

15.2-2122

.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

For article assessing the adequacy of Virginia’s water policy, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 312 (1972).

For comment on the problem of enforcement with regard to the secondary treatment standards pursuant to the 1972 Federal Water Pollution Control Act amendments, see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 581 (1978).

For comment on nonpoint pollution control in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 539 (1979).

For article on stream flow maintenance in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For survey of administrative procedure in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 431 (1989).

For survey on environmental law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 625 (1989).

For comment, “The Inconsistency of Virginia’s Execution of the NPDES Permit Program: The Foreclosure of Citizen Attorneys General from State and Federal Courts,” see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 715 (1995).

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

For article, “Environmental Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 601 (2001).

For article surveying changes in environmental law in Virginia from June 2001 to June 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 117 (2002).
